dictionaries/ca/index.aff
FLAG long
# Model de conjugació: bressar
SFX 25 Y 84
SFX 25 r r/_v_C_Y ar
SFX 25 r nt/_C ar
SFX 25 r t/_v_Y ar
SFX 25 r da/_Y ar
SFX 25 r ts/_Y ar
SFX 25 r des/_Y ar
SFX 25 ar o/_Z ar
SFX 25 ar e/_Z ar
SFX 25 sar 0/_Z ar
SFX 25 ar es/_Z ar
SFX 25 r 0/_Z ar
SFX 25 ar em/_Z ar
SFX 25 r m/_Z ar
SFX 25 ar eu/_Z ar
SFX 25 r u/_Z ar
SFX 25 ar en/_Z ar
SFX 25 r va/_Z ar
SFX 25 r ves/_Z ar
SFX 25 r va/_Z ar
SFX 25 ar àvem/_Z ar
SFX 25 ar àveu/_Z ar
SFX 25 r ven/_Z ar
SFX 25 ar í/_Z ar
SFX 25 r res/_Z ar
SFX 25 ar à/_Z ar
SFX 25 ar àrem/_Z ar
SFX 25 ar àreu/_Z ar
SFX 25 r ren/_Z ar
SFX 25 r ré/_Z ar
SFX 25 r ràs/_Z ar
SFX 25 r rà/_Z ar
SFX 25 r rem/_Z ar
SFX 25 r reu/_Z ar
SFX 25 r ran/_Z ar
SFX 25 r ria/_Z ar
SFX 25 r ries/_Z ar
SFX 25 r ria/_Z ar
SFX 25 r ríem/_Z ar
SFX 25 r ríeu/_Z ar
SFX 25 r rien/_Z ar
SFX 25 ar e/_Z ar
SFX 25 ar i/_Z ar
SFX 25 ar es/_Z ar
SFX 25 ar is/_Z ar
SFX 25 ar e/_Z ar
SFX 25 ar i/_Z ar
SFX 25 ar em/_Z ar
SFX 25 ar eu/_Z ar
SFX 25 ar en/_Z ar
SFX 25 ar in/_Z ar
SFX 25 ar és/_Z ar
SFX 25 r ra/_Z ar
SFX 25 ar às/_Z ar
SFX 25 ar essis/_Z ar
SFX 25 r res/_Z ar
SFX 25 r ssis/_Z ar
SFX 25 ar esses/_Z ar
SFX 25 r sses/_Z ar
SFX 25 ar és/_Z ar
SFX 25 r ra/_Z ar
SFX 25 ar às/_Z ar
SFX 25 ar éssim/_Z ar
SFX 25 ar àrem/_Z ar
SFX 25 ar àssim/_Z ar
SFX 25 ar éssem/_Z ar
SFX 25 ar àssem/_Z ar
SFX 25 ar éssiu/_Z ar
SFX 25 ar àreu/_Z ar
SFX 25 ar àssiu/_Z ar
SFX 25 ar ésseu/_Z ar
SFX 25 ar àsseu/_Z ar
SFX 25 ar essin/_Z ar
SFX 25 r ren/_Z ar
SFX 25 r ssin/_Z ar
SFX 25 ar essen/_Z ar
SFX 25 r ssen/_Z ar
SFX 25 r 0/_D ar
SFX 25 ar e/_D ar
SFX 25 ar i/_D ar
SFX 25 ar em/_C ar
SFX 25 r u/_C ar
SFX 25 ar eu/_C ar
SFX 25 ar en/_C ar
SFX 25 ar in/_C ar

# Model de conjugació: brunzir
SFX 26 Y 108
SFX 26 r r/_v_C_Y ir
SFX 26 r nt/_C ir
SFX 26 r t/_v_Y ir
SFX 26 r da/_Y ir
SFX 26 r ts/_Y ir
SFX 26 r des/_Y ir
SFX 26 ir eixo/_Z ir
SFX 26 ir o/_Z ir
SFX 26 r sc/_Z ir
SFX 26 ir 0/_Z ir
SFX 26 ir esc/_Z ir
SFX 26 ir eixes/_Z ir
SFX 26 ir es/_Z ir
SFX 26 r xes/_Z ir
SFX 26 ir 0/_Z ir
SFX 26 ir eix/_Z ir
SFX 26 r x/_Z ir
SFX 26 r m/_Z ir
SFX 26 r u/_Z ir
SFX 26 ir eixen/_Z ir
SFX 26 ir en/_Z ir
SFX 26 r xen/_Z ir
SFX 26 r a/_Z ir
SFX 26 r es/_Z ir
SFX 26 r a/_Z ir
SFX 26 ir íem/_Z ir
SFX 26 ir íeu/_Z ir
SFX 26 r en/_Z ir
SFX 26 ir í/_Z ir
SFX 26 r res/_Z ir
SFX 26 ir í/_Z ir
SFX 26 ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 26 ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 26 r ren/_Z ir
SFX 26 r ré/_Z ir
SFX 26 r ràs/_Z ir
SFX 26 r rà/_Z ir
SFX 26 r rem/_Z ir
SFX 26 r reu/_Z ir
SFX 26 r ran/_Z ir
SFX 26 r ria/_Z ir
SFX 26 r ries/_Z ir
SFX 26 r ria/_Z ir
SFX 26 r ríem/_Z ir
SFX 26 r ríeu/_Z ir
SFX 26 r rien/_Z ir
SFX 26 ir a/_Z ir
SFX 26 ir esca/_Z ir
SFX 26 r sca/_Z ir
SFX 26 ir esqui/_Z ir
SFX 26 ir eixi/_Z ir
SFX 26 r 0/_Z ir
SFX 26 ir es/_Z ir
SFX 26 ir esques/_Z ir
SFX 26 r sques/_Z ir
SFX 26 ir esquis/_Z ir
SFX 26 ir eixis/_Z ir
SFX 26 r s/_Z ir
SFX 26 ir a/_Z ir
SFX 26 ir esca/_Z ir
SFX 26 r sca/_Z ir
SFX 26 ir esqui/_Z ir
SFX 26 ir eixi/_Z ir
SFX 26 r 0/_Z ir
SFX 26 r m/_Z ir
SFX 26 r guem/_Z ir
SFX 26 r u/_Z ir
SFX 26 r gueu/_Z ir
SFX 26 ir en/_Z ir
SFX 26 ir esquen/_Z ir
SFX 26 r squen/_Z ir
SFX 26 ir esquin/_Z ir
SFX 26 ir eixin/_Z ir
SFX 26 r n/_Z ir
SFX 26 ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 26 r ra/_Z ir
SFX 26 r ssis/_Z ir
SFX 26 r res/_Z ir
SFX 26 r sses/_Z ir
SFX 26 ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 26 r ra/_Z ir
SFX 26 ir íssim/_Z ir
SFX 26 ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 26 ir íssem/_Z ir
SFX 26 ir íssiu/_Z ir
SFX 26 ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 26 ir ísseu/_Z ir
SFX 26 r ssin/_Z ir
SFX 26 r ren/_Z ir
SFX 26 r ssen/_Z ir
SFX 26 ir 0/_C ir
SFX 26 ir eix/_C ir
SFX 26 r x/_C ir
SFX 26 ir a/_D ir
SFX 26 ir esca/_D ir
SFX 26 r sca/_D ir
SFX 26 ir esqui/_D ir
SFX 26 ir eixi/_D ir
SFX 26 r 0/_D ir
SFX 26 r m/_C ir
SFX 26 r guem/_C ir
SFX 26 r u/_C ir
SFX 26 ir en/_C ir
SFX 26 ir esquen/_C ir
SFX 26 r squen/_C ir
SFX 26 ir esquin/_C ir
SFX 26 ir eixin/_C ir
SFX 26 r n/_C ir

# Model de conjugació: cabre
SFX 27 Y 74
SFX 27 re er/_v_C_Y re
SFX 27 e e/_v_D_Y re
SFX 27 re ent/_C re
SFX 27 re ut/_v_Y re
SFX 27 re uda/_Y re
SFX 27 re uts/_Y re
SFX 27 re udes/_Y re
SFX 27 re o/_Z re
SFX 27 bre p/_Z re
SFX 27 bre ps/_Z re
SFX 27 bre p/_Z re
SFX 27 re em/_Z re
SFX 27 re eu/_Z re
SFX 27 re en/_Z re
SFX 27 re ia/_Z re
SFX 27 re ies/_Z re
SFX 27 re ia/_Z re
SFX 27 re íem/_Z re
SFX 27 re íeu/_Z re
SFX 27 re ien/_Z re
SFX 27 re í/_Z re
SFX 27 re eres/_Z re
SFX 27 re é/_Z re
SFX 27 re érem/_Z re
SFX 27 re éreu/_Z re
SFX 27 re eren/_Z re
SFX 27 e é/_Z re
SFX 27 e às/_Z re
SFX 27 e à/_Z re
SFX 27 e em/_Z re
SFX 27 e eu/_Z re
SFX 27 e an/_Z re
SFX 27 e ia/_Z re
SFX 27 e ies/_Z re
SFX 27 e ia/_Z re
SFX 27 e íem/_Z re
SFX 27 e íeu/_Z re
SFX 27 e ien/_Z re
SFX 27 abre àpiga/_Z re
SFX 27 abre àpia/_Z re
SFX 27 abre àpigues/_Z re
SFX 27 abre àpies/_Z re
SFX 27 abre àpiga/_Z re
SFX 27 abre àpia/_Z re
SFX 27 bre piguem/_Z re
SFX 27 bre piem/_Z re
SFX 27 bre pigueu/_Z re
SFX 27 bre pieu/_Z re
SFX 27 abre àpiguen/_Z re
SFX 27 abre àpien/_Z re
SFX 27 re és/_Z re
SFX 27 re era/_Z re
SFX 27 re essis/_Z re
SFX 27 re eres/_Z re
SFX 27 re esses/_Z re
SFX 27 re és/_Z re
SFX 27 re era/_Z re
SFX 27 re éssim/_Z re
SFX 27 re érem/_Z re
SFX 27 re éssem/_Z re
SFX 27 re éssiu/_Z re
SFX 27 re éreu/_Z re
SFX 27 re ésseu/_Z re
SFX 27 re essin/_Z re
SFX 27 re eren/_Z re
SFX 27 re essen/_Z re
SFX 27 bre p/_C re
SFX 27 abre àpiga/_D re
SFX 27 abre àpia/_D re
SFX 27 bre piguem/_C re
SFX 27 bre piem/_C re
SFX 27 re eu/_C re
SFX 27 abre àpiguen/_C re
SFX 27 abre àpien/_C re

# Model de conjugació: caldre
SFX 28 Y 26
SFX 28 e e/_v_D_Y re
SFX 28 dre er/_v_C_Y re
SFX 28 dre ent/_C re
SFX 28 dre gut/_v_Y re
SFX 28 dre guda/_Y re
SFX 28 dre guts/_Y re
SFX 28 dre gudes/_Y re
SFX 28 dre 0/_Z re
SFX 28 dre en/_Z re
SFX 28 dre ia/_Z re
SFX 28 dre ien/_Z re
SFX 28 dre gué/_Z re
SFX 28 dre gueren/_Z re
SFX 28 e à/_Z re
SFX 28 e an/_Z re
SFX 28 e ia/_Z re
SFX 28 e ien/_Z re
SFX 28 dre ga/_Z re
SFX 28 dre gui/_Z re
SFX 28 dre guen/_Z re
SFX 28 dre guin/_Z re
SFX 28 dre gués/_Z re
SFX 28 dre guera/_Z re
SFX 28 dre guessin/_Z re
SFX 28 dre gueren/_Z re
SFX 28 dre guessen/_Z re

# Model de conjugació: cantar
SFX 29 Y 84
SFX 29 r r/_v_C_Y ar
SFX 29 r nt/_C ar
SFX 29 r t/_v_Y ar
SFX 29 r da/_Y ar
SFX 29 r ts/_Y ar
SFX 29 r des/_Y ar
SFX 29 ar o/_Z ar
SFX 29 ar e/_Z ar
SFX 29 ar 0/_Z ar
SFX 29 ar es/_Z ar
SFX 29 r 0/_Z ar
SFX 29 ar em/_Z ar
SFX 29 r m/_Z ar
SFX 29 ar eu/_Z ar
SFX 29 r u/_Z ar
SFX 29 ar en/_Z ar
SFX 29 r va/_Z ar
SFX 29 r ves/_Z ar
SFX 29 r va/_Z ar
SFX 29 ar àvem/_Z ar
SFX 29 ar àveu/_Z ar
SFX 29 r ven/_Z ar
SFX 29 ar í/_Z ar
SFX 29 r res/_Z ar
SFX 29 ar à/_Z ar
SFX 29 ar àrem/_Z ar
SFX 29 ar àreu/_Z ar
SFX 29 r ren/_Z ar
SFX 29 r ré/_Z ar
SFX 29 r ràs/_Z ar
SFX 29 r rà/_Z ar
SFX 29 r rem/_Z ar
SFX 29 r reu/_Z ar
SFX 29 r ran/_Z ar
SFX 29 r ria/_Z ar
SFX 29 r ries/_Z ar
SFX 29 r ria/_Z ar
SFX 29 r ríem/_Z ar
SFX 29 r ríeu/_Z ar
SFX 29 r rien/_Z ar
SFX 29 ar e/_Z ar
SFX 29 ar i/_Z ar
SFX 29 ar es/_Z ar
SFX 29 ar is/_Z ar
SFX 29 ar e/_Z ar
SFX 29 ar i/_Z ar
SFX 29 ar em/_Z ar
SFX 29 ar eu/_Z ar
SFX 29 ar en/_Z ar
SFX 29 ar in/_Z ar
SFX 29 ar és/_Z ar
SFX 29 r ra/_Z ar
SFX 29 ar às/_Z ar
SFX 29 ar essis/_Z ar
SFX 29 r res/_Z ar
SFX 29 r ssis/_Z ar
SFX 29 ar esses/_Z ar
SFX 29 r sses/_Z ar
SFX 29 ar és/_Z ar
SFX 29 r ra/_Z ar
SFX 29 ar às/_Z ar
SFX 29 ar éssim/_Z ar
SFX 29 ar àrem/_Z ar
SFX 29 ar àssim/_Z ar
SFX 29 ar éssem/_Z ar
SFX 29 ar àssem/_Z ar
SFX 29 ar éssiu/_Z ar
SFX 29 ar àreu/_Z ar
SFX 29 ar àssiu/_Z ar
SFX 29 ar ésseu/_Z ar
SFX 29 ar àsseu/_Z ar
SFX 29 ar essin/_Z ar
SFX 29 r ren/_Z ar
SFX 29 r ssin/_Z ar
SFX 29 ar essen/_Z ar
SFX 29 r ssen/_Z ar
SFX 29 r 0/_D ar
SFX 29 ar e/_D ar
SFX 29 ar i/_D ar
SFX 29 ar em/_C ar
SFX 29 r u/_C ar
SFX 29 ar eu/_C ar
SFX 29 ar en/_C ar
SFX 29 ar in/_C ar
