dictionaries/ca/index.dic
abaixar/29
abandonar/29
abarrotar/29
abeurar/29
abjurar/29
aboldronar/29
aborronar/29
abraonar/29
abriolar/29
absentar/29
abundar/29
academitzar/29
acalorar/29
acanalar/29
acanyar/29
acaragolar/29
acaronar/29
acastellanar/29
acatarrar/29
accelerar/29
acendrar/29
acetilar/29
acilar/29
aclaparar/29
aclotar/29
acodolar/29
acolorar/29
acompanyar/29
aconhortar/29
acopar/29
acordellar/29
acorriolar/29
acostar/29
acotxar/29
activar/29
acugular/29
aculturar/29
addicionar/29
adinyar/29
adminicular/29
adollar/29
adonitzar/29
adornar/29
adverar/29
afaiçonar/29
afanar/29
afectar/29
afermar/29
aficionar/29
afilerar/29
afitar/29
aflautar/29
afonar/29
afrontar/29
agafar/29
agarberar/29
agarrofar/29
agenollar/29
agilitzar/29
aglanar/29
agonitzar/29
agramar/29
agrumollar/29
aguantar/29
aidar/29
aixamfranar/29
ajornar/29
ajustar/29
alarmar/29
alcalinitzar/29
aleatoritzar/29
alfabetitzar/29
aljubar/29
alletar/29
allistar/29
allunar/29
alternar/29
al·legoritzar/29
amalgamar/29
amantar/29
amarrotar/29
ambientar/29
amenitzar/29
amistar/29
amollar/29
amonestar/29
amorrar/29
amortitzar/29
amputar/29
amuntanyar/29
anagramatitzar/29
anatematitzar/29
anellar/29
anhelar/29
aniquilar/29
anoditzar/29
ansar/29
antropomorfitzar/29
apallar/29
apanar/29
aparellar/29
apartar/29
apellar/29
apeçonar/29
apilonar/29
apinyotar/29
aplantillar/29
aplomar/29
aponar/29
appertitzar/29
apropar/29
apurar/29
aquistar/29
argollar/29
aromatitzar/29
arramblar/29
arrastrar/29
arrelar/29
arrestar/29
arrombollar/29
arruïnar/29
asilar/29
assampar/29
assenyalar/29
assolar/29
ataconar/29
atarterar/29
atestar/29
atorrollar/29
atrontollar/29
augmentar/29
autofacturar/29
avalar/29
avidar/29
azotitzar/29
bressar/25
brossar/25
brunzir/26
cabre/27
caldre/28
cassar/25
cessar/25
clissar/25
cossar/25
edulcorar/29
eixancarrar/29
eixivernar/29
electritzar/29
emanar/29
embalbar/29
embargolar/29
embarrotar/29
emboetar/29
emborratxar/29
embovar/29
embrosquilar/29
emfasitzar/29
emmanillar/29
emmatar/29
emmoquetar/29
emmurallar/29
empalmar/29
empaperar/29
emparquetar/29
empatar/29
empecadar/29
emperlar/29
empiconar/29
empitrar/29
empoderar/29
emporprar/29
empremtar/29
empurpurar/29
enasprar/29
encadellar/29
encalar/29
encanalar/29
encaparrar/29
encapotar/29
encarar/29
encarreronar/29
encastellar/29
encebar/29
encerrar/29
encimbellar/29
encistellar/29
enclotxar/29
encoixar/29
enconxar/29
encorralar/29
encrestar/29
encubellar/29
endiablar/29
endrapar/29
enfarcellar/29
enfelar/29
enfitorar/29
enformar/29
enfundar/29
engafar/29
engalonar/29
engarbullar/29
engastar/29
enginyar/29
engraellar/29
engreixar/29
engrunar/29
enguixar/29
enllagrimar/29
enlleixiuar/29
enlluentar/29
enquadernar/29
enrajolar/29
enredar/29
enretirar/29
enriuar/29
enrullar/29
ensalivar/29
ensenyar/29
ensofrar/29
ensumar/29
entarquimar/29
entendar/29
entomar/29
entorxar/29
entrecamar/29
entremesclar/29
entretallar/29
entrunyellar/29
envellutar/29
envinagrar/29
envoltar/29
enxopar/29
equiparar/29
erotitzar/29
esbalandrar/29
esbiaixar/29
esbordellar/29
esbrafar/29
esbrostar/29
escabellonar/29
escaguitxar/29
escaldufar/29
escamarrar/29
escantellar/29
escapollar/29
escarnufar/29
escarrollar/29
escatinyar/29
esclavonar/29
escodrinyar/29
esconillar/29
escorpitar/29
escridar/29
escugular/29
esdentar/29
esfumar/29
esgarranyar/29
esgatinyar/29
esgranar/29
esgrumollar/29
esgüellar/29
esmentar/29
esmorrar/29
espadellar/29
esparpellar/29
espatllar/29
espellofar/29
esperdigolar/29
espinyolar/29
espitllerar/29
espollar/29
esporular/29
espurnar/29
esquematitzar/29
esquitxar/29
estampar/29
estatitzar/29
estetitzar/29
estimbar/29
estiuar/29
estragallar/29
estrijolar/29
estubar/29
esventar/29
eternitzar/29
evaporar/29
excavar/29
execrar/29
exonerar/29
expilar/29
expugnar/29
extractar/29
fossar/25
fressar/25
frissar/25
glossar/25
handicapar/29
herboritzar/29
hidrolitzar/29
hissar/25
homogeneïtzar/29
humectar/29
il·lusionar/29
immolar/29
impersonalitzar/29
impostar/29
imputar/29
incorporar/29
indexar/29
infantar/29
infirmar/29
infrautilitzar/29
injectar/29
insolar/29
instrumentalitzar/29
interaccionar/29
internitzar/29
intitular/29
inventar/29
irar/29
iterar/29
lassar/25
llassar/25
llossar/25
missar/25
obsessionar/29
octubrar/29
ondar/29
optar/29
organitzar/29
orquestrar/29
ozonitzar/29
passar/25
rissar/25
tossar/25
trossar/25
tussar/25
ulular/29
urbanitzar/29
vessar/25
